Hawaii statutes.
§490:1-307 Prima facie evidence by
third-party documents. A document in due form purporting to be a bill of
lading, policy or certificate of insurance, official weigher's or inspector's
certificate, consular invoice, or any other document authorized or required by
the contract to be issued by a third party is prima facie evidence of its own
authenticity and genuineness and of the facts stated in the document by the
third party. [L 2004, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next